Florida, session 2026, SB648.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âEffective July 1, 2026, present subsections (13) 25 through (18) of section 409.962, Florida Statutes, are 26 redesignated as subsections (14) through (19), respectively, and 27 a new subsection (13) is added to that section, to read: 28 409.962âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, except as 29 otherwise specifically provided, the term: 30 (13)ââPediatric continuing care integrated communityâ means 31 a group of affiliated and integrated businesses that, as of July 32 1, 2026, are licensed or certified by the agency or the Agency 33 for Persons with Disabilities and collectively provide 34 coordinated care for Medicaid-eligible persons younger than 21 35 years of age who are medically fragile, including those who are 36 technology dependent. The term includes all of the following 37 entities under common ownership: 38 (a)âA community residential group home licensed under 39 chapter 393 providing residential care for medically complex 40 children. 41 (b)âA home health agency licensed under part III of chapter 42 400 providing private duty nursing services by registered nurses 43 or licensed practical nurses. 44 (c)âA prescribed pediatric extended care center licensed 45 under part VI of chapter 400. 46 (d)âA home medical equipment provider licensed under part 47 VII of chapter 400. 48 (e)âA health care clinic licensed under part X of chapter 49 400 providing speech-language therapy, physical therapy, or 50 occupational therapy. 51 Section 2.âSubsection (7) is added to section 409.975, 52 Florida Statutes, to read: 53 409.975âManaged care plan accountability.âIn addition to 54 the requirements of s. 409.967, plans and providers 55 participating in the managed medical assistance program shall 56 comply with the requirements of this section. 57 (7)âREIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES IN PEDIATRIC CONTINUING CARE 58 INTEGRATED COMMUNITIES.â 59 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 60 1.ââGeographic areaâ means the region or metropolitan 61 statistical area in which the pediatric continuing care 62 integrated community is located. 63 2.ââPrevailing hourly rateâ means the usual and customary 64 contracted hourly rate paid by Medicaid managed care plans to 65 providers for private duty nursing services in the same 66 geographic area during the current calendar year, which rate is 67 negotiated at least annually between the Medicaid managed care 68 plans and the provider of private duty nursing within the 69 community residential group home. 70 (b)âMedicaid managed care plans shall reimburse home health 71 agencies licensed under part III of chapter 400 for private duty 72 nursing services, including services provided by registered 73 nurses and licensed practical nurses, provided in a community 74 residential group home at 100 percent of the prevailing hourly 75 rate paid for private duty nursing services in the geographic 76 area, regardless of the number of plan members who share a 77 dwelling space within the community residential group home. 78 (c)âReimbursement may not be reduced based on the number of 79 Medicaid-eligible persons receiving private duty nursing 80 services in the same dwelling space, or on the same day, within 81 the community residential group home. 82 (d)âManaged care plans and the affiliated businesses shall 83 negotiate rates at least annually for medical services provided 84 within the pediatric continuing care integrated community. 85 Section 3.âWithin 30 days after the effective date of this 86 act, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall seek any 87 necessary federal approval, including through any necessary 88 state plan amendment or Medicaid waiver, to implement the 89 changes made by this act. The agency shall implement this act 90 upon receipt of federal approval. 91 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise provided in this act, this 92 act shall take effect upon becoming a law.